Wyoming, session 2026, HB0160.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 43-1-101 through 43-3-201 are created
to read:

TITLE 43
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
DISTRIBUTED LEDGER DIGITAL ASSETS AND SEALED TOKENS

CHAPTER 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

ARTICLE 1
DEFINITIONS AND CONSTRUCTION OF DEFINITIONS

43-1-101. Definitions.

(a) As used in this title:

(i) "Analytically prior" means a state where the
legal or technical characterization of one (1) object or
event logically precedes and constitutes a necessary
condition for the characterization of a subsequent object
or event;

(ii) "Associated sealed token" means a token
that does not constitute a sealed token but is connected to
a sealed token through a distributed ledger transaction
designated through a distributed ledger protocol or another
protocol;
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(iii) "Computational corpus" means the
collection of distributed ledger records and distributed
ledger protocol parameters representing the legal
characterization that computational indicia may evidence
with respect to a digital asset or token;

(iv) "Computational indicia" means discrete
data, records or attributes maintained on a distributed
ledger from which a computational corpus may be determined
through characterization under this title;

(v) "Consensus protocol" means the mechanism
through which distributed ledger nodes achieve agreement on
transaction validity, ordering and state transitions to
ensure a consistent ledger state across all nodes without
central coordination;

(vi) "Content identifier" or "CID" means a
digital fingerprint produced from content through
cryptographic hashing methods that serve as an address
reference to retrieve data and provide for non-repudiable
verification of integrity;
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(vii) "Control timestamp" means a temporal
marker produced and validated by a protocol that
establishes the specific moment at which an act of control
occurred over a distributed ledger record;

(viii) "Corpus" means the legal characterization
that indicia may evidence with respect to distributed
ledger digital assets, sealed tokens and tokens, whether or
not legally significant;

(ix) "Decentralized system" means a network of
nodes running a consensus protocol where no single
participant controls transaction validation, state
transitions or governance, with a consistent ledger state
replicated across all nodes;

(x) "Delegation" means the transfer of the
exercise of a governance power from the holder to a
delegate without transferring the underlying governance
token or governance jural relation;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(xi) "Delegation corpus" means the legal
characterization that a delegation indicia may evidence,
including transferring the exercise of a governance power
from a delegator to a delegate without transferring the
underlying governance token;

(xii) "Delegation indicia" means observable data
from which a delegation corpus may be determined through
characterization under this title. "Delegation indicia"
shall include delegation instructions, delegator and
delegate identifiers, scope fields, duration fields and
revocation records;

(xiii) "Digital asset" means a digital
representation of value, rights, powers or other interests
recorded on a cryptographically secured distributed ledger
that is capable of being transferred, stored or controlled
through cryptographic keys;

(xiv) "Distributed ledger" means technology
through which a shared state remains recorded, synchronized
and maintained across a network in which cryptography and a
consensus protocol verify and finalize state transitions;
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(xv) "Distributed ledger digital asset" means
the aggregate construct of one (1) or more sealed tokens
cryptographically recorded on or referenced by a
distributed ledger across multiple sequential or concurrent
transactions over time;

(xvi) "Distributed ledger protocol" means the
complete specification of rules and mechanisms governing a
distributed ledger system's operation. "Distributed ledger
protocol" shall include a consensus protocol, network
communication, state transition, transaction processing and
execution logic;

(xvii) "Distributed ledger transaction" means a
state transition that is comprised of inputs, outputs and
cryptographic signatures validated by a distributed ledger
protocol and recorded as ledger state upon execution;

(xviii) "Evidentiary corpus" means the fact, res
or jural relation representing the legal characterization
that an evidentiary indicia may evidence, whether
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
maintained on a distributed ledger, in a sealed token or in
any other system;

(xix) "Evidentiary data" means data recorded to
a distributed ledger or distributed ledger protocol that,
together with its subject matter, demonstrates the
existence, integrity and historical sequence of a fact, res
or jural relation;

(xx) "Evidentiary indicia" means distributed
ledger mechanisms by which an evidentiary corpus remains
authenticated and verified. "Evidentiary indicia" shall
include cryptographic signatures, hashes, timestamps,
finality proofs and cryptographic embodiment in a
distributed ledger protocol or sealed token;

(xxi) "Governance disability" means the
correlative absence of a governance power by which a person
remains unable to change the jural relations of an immunity
holder through the exercise of governance mechanisms;

(xxii) "Governance disability corpus" means the
legal characterization that a governance disability indicia
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
may evidence. "Governance disability corpus" shall include
the legal position corresponding to the absence of
governance power by which a person cannot change specified
jural relations;

(xxiii) "Governance disability indicia" means
observable data from which a governance disability corpus
may be determined through characterization under this
title. "Governance disability indicia" shall include
non-voting status, restricted role flags, disabled
permissions, class-based exclusions and protocol rules;

(xxiv) "Governance immunity" means a Hohfeldian
immunity disabling another person from exercising a
governance power to change the holder's jural relations.
"Governance immunity" shall include minority protections,
veto rights, supermajority requirements and charter based
constraints;

(xxv) "Governance immunity corpus" means the
legal characterization that a governance immunity indicia
may evidence. "Governance immunity corpus" shall include
legal protections disabling another person from exercising
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
a governance power to change the holder's governance jural
relations or charter based constraints;

(xxvi) "Governance immunity indicia" means
observable data from which a governance immunity corpus may
be determined through characterization under this title.
"Governance immunity indicia" shall include special class
designations, protective provisions, veto flags,
supermajority thresholds and immunity clauses;

(xxvii) "Governance jural relation" means a
jural relation pertaining to collective decision-making for
a distributed ledger digital asset, protocol or
organization. "Governance jural relation" shall include
powers, liabilities, immunities and disabilities exercised
through governance mechanisms;

(xxviii) "Governance jural relation corpus"
means the legal characterization that a governance jural
relation may evidence. "Governance jural relation corpus"
shall include governance powers, governance liabilities,
governance immunities and governance disabilities attaching
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
to a specified res, interests or roles within an
organization;

(xxix) "Governance jural relation indicia" means
observable data from which a governance jural relation
corpus may be determined through characterization under
this title. "Governance jural relation indicia" shall
include token balances, voting records, delegation records
and governing instrument references;

(xxx) "Governance liability" means the
correlative liability of a person or protocol to have the
person or protocol's jural relations changed by the
exercise of a governance power, without the person's
consent to the specific change;

(xxxi) "Governance liability corpus" means the
legal characterization that a governance liability indicia
may evidence. "Governance liability corpus" shall include
the legal position of a person subject to changes in
governance jural relations through the exercise of
governance power;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(xxxii) "Governance liability indica" means
observable data from which a governance liability corpus
may be determined through characterization under this
title. "Governance liability indicia" shall include
membership records, token holdings, role designations and
protocol rules identifying the parties that are bound by
the rules;

(xxxiii) "Governance power" means a Hohfeldian
power held by a person to participate in collective
decision-making. "Governance power" shall include voting,
proposal, delegation or veto power by which the holder may
unilaterally or collectively change jural relations;

(xxxiv) "Governance power corpus" means the
legal characterization that a governance power indicia may
evidence. "Governance power corpus" shall include the legal
capacity of a person to change governance jural relations
of other persons, organizations or protocols through
governance mechanisms;

(xxxv) "Governance power indicia" means
observable data from which a governance power corpus may be
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
determined through characterization under this title.
"Governance power indicia" shall include token-weighted
mappings, role assignments, access controls, delegation
records and protocol-specified permissions;

(xxxvi) "Governance token" means a sealed token
or distributed ledger digital asset representing one (1) or
more governance jural relations defined by a protocol,
including governance powers, governance liabilities,
governance immunities or governance disabilities;

(xxxvii) "Governance token corpus" means the
legal characterization that a governance token indicia may
evidence. "Governance token corpus" shall include the
bundle of governance jural relations represented by a token
associated with holding, delegating or disposing of that
token;

(xxxviii) "Governance token indicia" means
observable data from which a governance token corpus may be
determined through characterization under this title.
"Governance token indicia" shall include token balances,
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
classes, role mappings, delegation records, vesting status
and protocol logic;

(xxxix) "Governing instrument" means the
articles of organization, bylaws, protocol rules or smart
contract code defining the governance jural relations,
governance mechanisms and decision-making procedures
applicable to a distributed legal digital asset;

(xl) "Governing instrument corpus" means the
legal characterization that a governing instrument indicia
may evidence. "Governing instrument corpus" shall include
the composite legal framework, governance jural relations
and decision-making procedures established by a governing
instrument;

(xli) "Governing instrument indicia" means
observable data from which a governing instrument corpus
may be determined through characterization under this
title. "Governing instrument indicia" shall include
recorded charters, bylaws, protocol rules, smart contract
code and amendment records;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(xlii) "Indicia" means observable data, records
or attributes recorded on or referenced by a distributed
ledger without regard to legal effect from which a corpus
may be determined through characterization under this
title;

(xliii) "Indicia corpus characterization" means
the determination of observable indicia on a distributed
ledger and the legal characterization that such indicia
evidence with respect to distributed ledger digital assets
and sealed tokens;

(xliv) "Jural relation" means a legal relation
between parties consisting of correlative pairs. "Jural
relation" shall include rights, duties, privileges, power,
liabilities, immunities, disabilities and defining the
positions of power;

(xlv) "Keyholder" means a person possessing the
power to control a private key for the purposes of
generating a cryptographic signature or otherwise
exercising control over a distributed ledger record;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(xlvi) "Keyholder corpus" means the collection
of cryptographic relationships and control capacities
representing the legal characterization that a keyholder
indicia may evidence with respect to a public address or
distributed ledger transaction;

(xlvii) "Keyholder indicia" means verifiable
evidence establishing keyholder control, including valid
cryptographic signatures and address signifiers from which
a keyholder corpus may be determined through
characterization under this title;

(xlviii) "Lex authenticandi" means the law of
authentication consisting of rules, protocols and standards
governing the verification of cryptographic signatures and
the attribution of acts within a distributed ledger system;

(xlix) "Lex situs" means the doctrine under
which the law of the jurisdiction where property remains
situated governs the property rights and interests in such
property;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(l) "Lex specialis" means a doctrine of
construction under which a provision governing specific
subject matter shall prevail over a general provision,
while permitting concurrent application of multiple legal
regimes;

(li) "Miner" means a node performing
computational work to propose blocks and validate
transactions according to a consensus protocol and maintain
state agreement which may receive protocol defined rewards;

(lii) "Multi-aspect analysis" means an
examination of digital assets and sealed tokens to identify
jurisdictional nexus and simultaneously applicable legal
regimes, coordinating subject matter characterization and
indicia corpus characterization;

(liii) "Node" means any hardware or software
arrangement communicating across a network to validate
transactions, participate in consensus, maintain data state
or provide network access that comprises participants,
keyholders and service providers;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(liv) "Oracle data" means attestation data
encoding, supplying or updating an evidentiary corpus as an
input to a protocol, smart contract or distributed ledger
digital asset, including data changing over time such as
market prices or operational signals;

(lv) "Oracle corpus" means the legal
characterization that an oracle indicia may evidence.
"Oracle corpus" shall include facts, res, jural relations
or state conditions used as inputs to protocols, smart
contracts or distributed ledger digital assets;

(lvi) "Oracle indicia" means observable data,
records or attributes from which an oracle corpus may be
determined through characterization under this title.
"Oracle indicia" shall include source attestations,
cryptographic signatures, cryptographic hashes, timestamps
and finality proofs;

(lvii) "Participant" means any person
transacting on, operating or using distributed ledger
infrastructure or maintaining any jural relation with a
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
digital asset, including the custody, control or beneficial
ownership of a digital asset;

(lviii) "Programmable unit" means a token
executing pursuant to encoded instructions, protocol logic
or smart contract logic recorded on a distributed ledger
and capable of implementing automated state transitions;

(lix) "Proposal" means a governance action
submitted for consideration under a governance mechanism,
the approval or rejection of which may create, modify or
extinguish jural relations among persons, organizations or
protocols;

(lx) "Proposal corpus" means the legal
characterization that a proposal indicia may evidence.
"Proposal corpus" shall include specific changes to
governance jural relations, protocol parameters or
organizational actions submitted for a decision under
governance mechanisms;

(lxi) "Proposal indicia" means observable data
from which a proposal corpus may be determined through
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
characterization under this title. "Proposal indicia" shall
include proposal texts, identifiers, metadata, sponsoring
addresses, submission timestamps and protocol code links;

(lxii) "Protocol" means a specification of
format, computational logic and control that is independent
of any programming language, deployed on or applied to the
operations of a distributed ledger. "Protocol" shall
include binary or text formats;

(lxiii) "Protocol and smart contract
characterization" means the determination of computational
elements by creating entries on a distributed ledger that
underlies the subject matter characterization and indicia
corpus characterization of digital assets;

(lxix) "Protocol and smart contract corpus"
means token data and distributed ledger content
representing the legal characterization that protocol and
smart contract indicia may evidence with respect to digital
assets;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(lxx) "Protocol and smart contract indicia"
means token data indicia and distributed ledger indicia
from which a protocol and a smart contract corpus may be
determined through characterization under this title;

(lxxi) "Protocol rules" means the machine
executable system enforced rules of a distributed ledger
consisting of protocol specification, smart contract code
and validation mechanisms that govern transaction
processing;

(lxxii) "Quorum" means the minimum participation
threshold required for a governance action to have legal
effect as defined by the governing instrument, protocol or
smart contract that governs a distributed ledger digital
asset;

(lxxiii) "Quorum corpus" means the legal
characterization that a quorum indicia may evidence.
"Quorum corpus" shall include the legal condition in which
participation in a governance action satisfies the minimum
threshold required for that governance action to carry
effect;
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(lxxiv) "Quorum indicia" means observable data
from which a quorum corpus may be determined through
characterization under this title. "Quorum indicia" shall
include participation counts, voting weight aggregates,
threshold parameters, snapshot data and threshold
attestations;

(lxxv) "Res" means the thing, interest or
subject matter that is identified through subject matter
characterization to which jural relations, property rights
or other legal consequences may attach through operation of
the law;

(lxxvi) "Sealed instrument" means a sealed token
classified under this title as a bearer, registered,
claims, fiduciary or proprietary instrument that evidences
a sealed controllable electronic record and associated
jural relations;

(lxxvii) "Sealed instrument corpus" means the
legal characterization, transfer mechanics and jural
relations that represents the legal characterization that a
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
sealed instrument indicia may evidence with respect to
instruments classified under this title;

(lxxviii) "Sealed instrument indicia" means
observable data, records or attributes relating to bearer,
registered, claims, fiduciary or proprietary instruments
from which a sealed instrument corpus may be determined
through characterization under this title;

(lxxix) "Sealed interest" means a substantive
legal consequence created, transferred or modified by a
transaction that is evidenced by a sealed instrument,
including ownership, contractual or security interests that
embodies jural relations;

(lxxx) "Sealed interest corpus" means the
collection of ownership, contractual or jural relations
representing the legal characterization that a sealed
interest indicia may evidence with respect to digital
assets and sealed tokens;

(lxxxi) "Sealed interest indicia" means
observable data, records or attributes from which a sealed
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
interest corpus may be determined through characterization
under this title. "Sealed interest indicia" shall include
sealed instrument indicia and jural relations indicia;

(lxxxii) "Sealed jurisdictional nexus" means the
juridical connection between a keyholder and Wyoming that
arises from qualifying conditions sufficient to deem a
transaction situated in Wyoming for purposes of lex situs;

(lxxxiii) "Sealed jurisdictional nexus corpus"
means the collection of juridical relationships and
keyholder conditions that represents the legal
characterization that a sealed jurisdictional nexus indicia
may evidence with respect to digital assets;

(lxxxiv) "Sealed jurisdictional nexus indicia"
means verifiable evidence establishing a sealed
jurisdictional nexus from which a sealed jurisdictional
corpus may be determined through characterization under
this title;

(lxxxv) "Sealed keyholder" means a keyholder
establishing a sealed jurisdictional nexus to Wyoming and a
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
sealed keyholder lex situs with respect to a digital asset
or sealed token through qualifying conditions;

(lxxxvi) "Sealed keyholder lex situs" means the
jurisdictional anchor to Wyoming arising from the
cryptographic relationship, signing authority and nexus
factors of a sealed keyholder under this title;

(lxxxvii) "Sealed keyholder lex situs corpus"
means the collection of cryptographic relationships and
signing authorities representing the legal characterization
that a sealed keyholder lex situs indicia may evidence as
intangible property;

(lxxxviii) "Sealed keyholder lex situs indicia"
means verifiable evidence establishing a jurisdictional
anchor to Wyoming from which a sealed keyholder lex situs
corpus may be determined through characterization under
this title;

(lxxxix) "Sealed token" means a digital asset
possessing a sealed jurisdictional nexus and lex situs in
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
Wyoming independent of subject matter through at least one
(1) sealed keyholder or sealed token protocol;

(xc) "Sealed token data" means evidentiary data
and descriptive data recorded on or referenced by a
distributed ledger, potentially recorded without legal
effect, that constitutes subject matter distinct from
sealed token situs;

(xci) "Signifier" means the public address or
wallet address corresponding to a public key recorded
within a distributed ledger transaction to identify the
locus of signing authority;

(xcii) "Smart contract" means a self-executing
computer program deployed on a distributed ledger
executing, controlling or documenting events according to
predetermined conditions, whether or not such code
implements a protocol;

(xciii) "State transition" means changes from one
(1) recorded state to another state of a distributed ledger
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
or token that reflects the updates to balances, rights or
data under consensus protocol or rules;

(xciv) "Subject matter characterization" means
the determination of the composite legal package attaching
to digital assets. "Subject matter characterization" shall
include res, jural relations, incidents of ownership and
data maintained on a distributed ledger;

(xcv) "Subject matter corpus" means the
collection of property interests and jural relations
representing the legal characterization that a subject
matter indicia may evidence with respect to distributed
ledger digital assets;

(xcvi) "Subject matter indicia" means data,
records or attributes on a distributed ledger from which a
subject matter corpus may be determined through
characterization under this title;

(xcvii) "Subject matter lex situs" means the
jurisdictional anchor based on the nature, classification
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
or location of an object of legal right and all jural
relations that comprise such subject matter;

(xcviii) "Subject matter lex situs corpus" means
the collection of legal attributes and jural relations
representing the legal characterization that a subject
matter lex situs indicia may evidence;

(xcix) "Subject matter lex situs indicia" means
data, records, markers or legal instruments that identifies
the subject matter from which a subject matter lex situs
corpus may be determined under this title;

(c) "Token" means a fungible or non-fungible digital
representation of data, value, rights or evidence recorded
on a distributed ledger, with or without legal effect,
including cryptocurrencies or programmable units;

(ci) "Token protocol" means an autonomous,
self-executing protocol or smart contract defining token
behavior and transfer rules deployed to a distributed
ledger consisting of a collection of protocol values and
data;
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(cii) "Token protocol corpus" means the
collection of executable logic and behavioral rules
representing the legal characterization that a token
protocol indicia may evidence with respect to distributed
ledger digital assets;

(ciii) "Token protocol indicia" means data,
records or attributes on a distributed ledger from which a
token protocol corpus may be determined through
characterization under this title;

(civ) "Token type" means a classification of a
token determined by functionality, attributes and transfer
mechanisms specifying the creation, transfer or redemption
of that token's value and data;

(cv) "Transaction corpus" means the collection of
cryptographic validations and state changes representing
the legal characterization that a transaction indicia may
evidence. "Transaction corpus" shall include distributed
ledger digital assets and sealed tokens;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(cvi) "Transaction indicia" means observable
data, records or attributes from which a transaction corpus
may be determined through characterization under this
title. "Transaction indicia" shall include cryptographic
signatures and finality;

(cvii) "UCC" means the Uniform Commercial Code
under title 34.1 of the Wyoming statutes;

(cviii) "Validator" means a node validating
transactions and ensuring the addition of only valid blocks
or analogous constructs according to a consensus protocol
to maintain ledger integrity;

(cix) "Vote" means the exercise of a governance
power through a distributed ledger transaction, smart
contract transaction or protocol mechanism by which the
holder participates in collective decision-making for a
digital asset;

(cx) "Vote corpus" means the legal
characterization that a vote indicia may evidence,
including the legal effect of exercising a governance power
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
through a vote or proposed changes to governance jural
relations or protocol parameters;

(cxi) "Vote indicia" means observable data from
which a vote corpus may be determined through
characterization under this title. "Vote indicia" shall
include ballot records, transaction calls, signature
records, choice encodings, voting weights and tallies.

43-1-102. Construction of definitions.

(a) The terms sealed keyholder, sealed keyholder lex
situs, sealed jurisdictional nexus and sealed token shall
be construed as components of an integrated jurisdictional
framework.

(b) The terms consensus protocol, decentralized
system, distributed ledger, miner, node, participant and
validator shall be construed as components of integrated
distributed ledger technology.

(c) The terms in subsections (a) and (b) of this
section are intentionally interdependent and shall be
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
construed as a unified whole. A court shall not hold any
terms in subsections (a) and (b) of this section as void
for circularity, ambiguity or vagueness solely because the
term references another term defined in this title.

ARTICLE 2
PURPOSE, SCOPE AND APPLICABILITY

43-1-201. Legislative findings.

(a) The legislature finds that:

(i) Digital assets recorded on distributed
ledgers possess distinct legal characteristics requiring
scope and interpretation rules different from digital
assets that are not recorded;

(ii) Distributed ledger and token architectures
require two interdependent asset class designations:

(A) Distributed ledger digital assets; and

(B) Sealed tokens.
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(iii) A sealed token cannot exist without the
distributed ledger digital asset existing across multiple
sequential transactions and a distributed ledger digital
asset requires sealed tokens for scope and interpretive
analysis of legal effects inherent to distributed ledgers
and token implementation;

(iv) Digital assets on distributed ledgers
require multi-aspect analysis examining property,
commercial law, jurisdictional nexus and other legal
dimensions simultaneously;

(v) A single digital asset may have multiple lex
situs and multiple lex specialis applied to different
aspects, analogous to multiple regimes, including those
provided in the UCC;

(vi) Traditional single-situs and single-regime
analysis cannot adequately address digital assets existing
simultaneously across multiple nodes, jurisdictions and
legal frameworks;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(vii) Digital asset implementations do not fall
into discrete legal categories, requiring designation of
sealed instruments, sealed tokens and sealed jural
relations to address hybrid and composite legal
characteristics.

43-1-202. Purpose.

(a) The purposes of this title are to:

(i) Establish a sealed token framework
recognizing the distinct and interdependent nature of
distributed ledger digital assets and sealed tokens;

(ii) Provide designation of sealed instruments,
sealed tokens and sealed jural relations to address digital
assets exhibiting characteristics across multiple legal
categories;

(iii) Provide an analysis framework of corpus
and indicia for interpretation of digital assets having
non-standard legal forms;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(iv) Provide both classification of designated
digital assets and an analysis framework for token
classification through interpretation of functionality and
legal effects;

(v) Provide scope and interpretation rules
accommodating multi-aspect, multi-situs and multi-regime
analysis;

(vi) Provide legal clarity for courts, agencies,
auditors and administrators;

(vii) Promote legal certainty and predictability
for digital asset property rights and commercial
transactions;

(viii) Establish Wyoming as a jurisdiction
providing sophisticated legal treatment of distributed
ledger technologies.

43-1-203. General scope and applicability.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(a) This title shall apply to digital assets that
operate on or through a distributed ledger system.

(b) This title shall designate and classify digital
assets cryptographically recorded on a distributed ledger
as distributed ledger digital assets and sealed tokens and
shall govern the classification, rights, interests,
obligations and jural relations associated with such assets
and token data.

(c) This title shall apply to all assets and data
recorded on or referenced by a distributed ledger, whether
or not such assets or data carries legal effect.

(d) This title shall provide the interpretive
framework to determine the scope, applicability and legal
effect of the assets and data.

(e) This title shall establish lex situs and nexus in
Wyoming for keyholders as provided under W.S. 43-1-302.

(f) The scope of a distributed ledger digital asset
or sealed token shall be characterized simultaneously by
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
the distributed ledger digital asset or sealed token's
record on the distributed ledger and by the
characterization of the distributed ledger digital asset or
sealed token's subject matter. Each distributed ledger
digital asset and sealed token shall have different scope
determinations, lex situs and applicable regimes of law.

(g) Distributed ledger digital assets and sealed
tokens shall be classified according to the token
classifications and token taxonomies established throughout
this title.

(h) The relationship between this title and title 34,
chapter 29 of the Wyoming statutes shall be as provided
under W.S. 43-1-211.

(j) The relationship between this title and the UCC
and other applicable law shall be as provided under W.S.
43-1-211 and article 3 of this chapter.

(k) The scope provisions of this section shall be
subordinate to:

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(i) The sealed scope hierarchy established under
W.S. 43-1-204 through 43-1-209;

(ii) The multi-aspect framework established
under W.S. 43-1-210.

(m) The sealed scope hierarchy established under W.S.
43-1-204 through 43-1-209 shall control all scope
determinations under this title. The multi-aspect framework
under W.S. 43-1-210 shall supplement the sealed scope
hierarchy for all scope and interpretive analysis under
this title.

(n) Where this section conflicts with the sealed
scope hierarchy under W.S. 43-1-204 through 43-1-209 or the
multi-aspect framework under W.S. 43-1-210, the sealed
scope hierarchy and multi-aspect framework shall control.

43-1-204. Sealed scope hierarchy.

(a) This section shall establish and designate the
sealed scope hierarchy governing the application and
interpretation of all statutes and provisions under this
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
title. The sealed scope hierarchy shall apply in the
following order of precedence:

(i) Statute scope, as provided under W.S.
43-1-205;

(ii) Sealed jurisdictional nexus scope, as
provided under W.S. 43-1-206;

(iii) Distributed-ledger-digital-asset scope, as
provided under W.S. 43-1-207;

(iv) Subject matter scope, as provided under
W.S. 43-1-208;

(v) Legal regime scope, as provided under W.S.
43-1-209.

(b) The sealed scope hierarchy under this section
shall govern courts, agencies, auditors, administrators and
other interpreters in applying this title. Each tier shall
operate as a separate analytical layer and completion of
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
analysis at one (1) tier shall constitute a prerequisite to
analysis at the subsequent tier.

43-1-205. Statute scope.

(a) Statute scope shall provide the threshold
determination of applicable law, including whether this
title, title 34, chapter 29 of the Wyoming statutes, the
UCC or other bodies of law govern a transaction, asset or
relation.

(b) The statute scope analysis shall precede all
other scope determinations under the sealed scope hierarchy
provided by W.S. 43-1-204 through 43-1-209.

43-1-206. Sealed lex situs scope.

(a) The sealed lex situs scope shall provide the
framework to determine:

(i) Whether a digital asset on a distributed
ledger falls within this title;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(ii) The establishment of lex situs for
jurisdiction in this state over sealed tokens, distributed
ledger digital assets, key holders and other sealed
framework designations;

(iii) The characterization of sealed framework
designations as intangible property for jurisdictional
nexus purposes that shall be separate from subject matter
characterization under W.S. 43-1-208.

43-1-207. Distributed ledger digital asset scope.

(a) The distributed ledger digital asset scope shall
provide the framework to determine the level of
interpretive analysis.

(b) The distributed ledger digital asset scope shall
determine whether classification and interpretation occur
at the level of:

(i) A distributed ledger digital asset,
identifying and classifying multiple tokens across
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
sequential transactions as the same digital asset
construct; or

(ii) An individual token or sealed token
associated with this state.

(c) The distributed ledger digital asset scope shall
include analysis of legal effects arising from execution of
legal instruments, interests or jural relations occurring
over multiple distributed ledger transactions associated
with multiple tokens.

43-1-208. Subject matter scope.

(a) The subject matter scope shall provide the
framework to:

(i) Determine the classification of distributed
ledger digital assets and sealed tokens by identifying the
legal characterization that an indicia may evidence as a
corpus;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(ii) Conduct a multi-aspect analysis, which
shall include the evaluation of functionality, property
interests, res and jural relations;

(iii) Characterize the subject matter or res as
intangible, tangible or real property, which shall proceed
independently of the sealed lex situs characterization
under W.S. 43-1-206(a)(iii).

43-1-209. Legal regime scope.

The legal regime scope shall apply a multi-regime analysis
as provided under W.S. 43-1-301 to determine the applicable
law for each legal dimension of a distributed ledger
digital asset or sealed token established under the subject
matter scope under W.S. 43-1-208.

43-1-210. Multi-aspect framework.

(a) The sealed scope hierarchy established under W.S.
43-1-204 through 43-1-209 shall be supplemented by the
multi-aspect framework for scope and interpretive matters
as provided under provisions of this title.
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(b) The multi-aspect framework shall apply in
addition to the sealed scope hierarchy and shall provide
analytical methodology at each tier of the sealed scope
hierarchy.

(c) The sealed scope hierarchy shall constitute the
threshold analytical sequence within the multi-aspect
framework.

(d) The sealed scope hierarchy shall be applied
strictly and in order as a prerequisite to detailed
multi-aspect analysis under this title.

(e) Each tier of the sealed scope hierarchy shall be
analyzed through the multi-aspect framework provisions of
this title.

43-1-211. Relationship to title 34, chapter 29 of the
Wyoming statutes; applicability.

(a) This title shall govern digital assets recorded
on or referenced by a distributed ledger through
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
cryptographic procedures. Digital assets recorded on or
referenced by a distributed ledger through cryptographic
procedures shall be designated as distributed ledger
digital assets, sealed tokens and the digital assets and
sealed tokens derivatives under this title.

(b) Digital assets governed by this title shall be
excluded from the provisions of title 34, chapter 29 of the
Wyoming statutes except as provided by subsections (d)
through (f) of this section.

(c) Digital assets that are not recorded on or
referenced by a distributed ledger through cryptographic
procedures shall continue to be governed by title 34,
chapter 29 of the Wyoming statutes and this title shall not
apply to those assets.

(d) The securities provisions under title 34, chapter
29 of the Wyoming statutes shall continue to be applicable
and in force and effect as applied to distributed ledger
digital assets, supplemented by this title. Where this
title supplements the securities provisions under title 34,
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
chapter 29 of the Wyoming statutes, this title shall
control.

(e) The currency provisions under title 34, chapter
29 of the Wyoming statutes shall continue to be applicable
and in force and effect as applied to distributed ledger
digital assets, supplemented by this title. Where this
title supplements the currency provisions under title 34,
chapter 29 of the Wyoming statutes, this title shall
control.

(f) The utility token provisions and consumer
protection provisions under title 34, chapter 29 of the
Wyoming statutes as applied to digital assets shall remain
in force and effect and shall be applicable to distributed
ledger digital assets under this title.

ARTICLE 3
GENERAL INTERPRETIVE PROVISIONS

43-1-301. Multi-situs and multi-lex specialis
framework.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(a) A distributed ledger digital asset or a sealed
token may simultaneously be subject to multiple and
differing lex specialis. Each distributed ledger digital
asset and sealed token shall govern distinct legal aspects
or domains.

(b) A sealed token, sealed instrument or sealed jural
relation may evidence, record or document any interest,
right, obligation or relation cognizable under law.

(c) No limitation in this title shall restrict the
legal regimes applicable to a distributed ledger digital
asset or a sealed token to any enumerated category.

(d) Multiple legal regimes may apply simultaneously
to the same distributed ledger digital asset or sealed
token, including:

(i) Property law;

(ii) Contract law;

(iii) Commercial law under the UCC;
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(iv) Federal and state securities law;

(v) Commodities law;

(vi) Tax law;

(vii) Bankruptcy law;

(viii) Any other specialized statutory or
regulatory regimes.

(e) Multiple UCC articles may apply to a distributed
ledger digital asset and a sealed token as determined by:

(i) The distributed ledger digital asset's
functionality, classification and taxonomy under this
title; and

(ii) The sealed token's functionality,
classification and taxonomy under this title.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(f) The lex specialis from other bodies of law may
simultaneously apply to the same distributed ledger digital
asset or sealed token according to the legal domain or
subject matter involved. Each applicable lex specialis
shall govern its respective legal domain independently,
without regard to other lex specialis by applying to the
same distributed ledger digital asset or sealed token.

(g) Each applicable lex specialis and choice of law
principle shall operate independently. Courts and
administrators shall engage in a multi-layered legal
analysis rather than collapsing a distributed ledger
digital asset or sealed token into a single legal
characterization.

(h) Distributed ledger digital assets and sealed
tokens under this title shall be characterized by the
simultaneous application of multiple lex situs and multiple
lex specialis. Federal and state regulatory regimes may
apply concurrently to different aspects of the same
distributed ledger digital asset or sealed token. Multiple
state regimes may apply concurrently where jurisdictional
nexus exists under each regime. Simultaneous application of
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
multiple regimes shall not create conflict where each
regime governs a distinct legal dimension established under
the subject matter scope. The simultaneous application of
the doctrine of conflict of laws and the doctrine of choice
of law shall govern the legal characterization and
interpretation of distributed ledger digital assets and
sealed tokens under this title. Application under this
subsection shall be analogous to how the UCC permits
multiple articles to apply concurrently to the same
property or transaction.

(j) The framework established under this title shall
accommodate an analysis under any legal regime, present or
future and shall apply to interests or relations evidenced
through distributed ledger technology.

43-1-302. Sealed lex situs.

(a) A distributed ledger digital asset or sealed
token shall have lex situs scope in this state if a
keyholder having nexus with Wyoming cryptographically signs
or controls such asset or token.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(b) The sealed lex situs corpus of a distributed
ledger digital asset or sealed token shall constitute
intangible property under Wyoming law. This designation
shall attach to the token by virtue of the cryptographic
signature and keyholder nexus, independent of:

(i) The nature, content or legal effect of any
data or information recorded on or associated with such
token;

(ii) Whether such data or information
constitutes evidentiary information, descriptive
information or information having legal effect under this
title or any other law.

(c) A distributed ledger digital asset or a sealed
token may have:

(i) A sealed lex situs in Wyoming as intangible
property under subsection (b) of this section; and

(ii) A separate lex situs determination under
the subject matter scope for any interest, right,
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
obligation or relation evidenced by the data or information
recorded on or associated with such token.

(d) The sealed lex situs as intangible property under
this section shall exist and have legal force and effect
independent of any legal characterization or effect of the
recorded data or information. The sealed lex situs corpus
shall provide the jurisdictional foundation for application
of this title regardless of whether the recorded
information:

(i) Has immediate legal effect;

(ii) Has potential future legal effect;

(iii) Has no legal effect; or

(iv) Consists solely of evidentiary information
or descriptive information.

(e) For purposes of establishing a sealed lex situs
under this section, a keyholder nexus with this state may
include:
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(i) A domicile or residence in Wyoming;

(ii) An organization or formation under Wyoming
law;

(iii) A registration or qualification under
Wyoming law;

(iv) Any other connections establishing
jurisdiction under Wyoming law;

(v) A nexus established consistent with the
requirements and limitations under the sealed token lex
situs nexus privacy provisions as provided in this title.

(f) A sealed lex situs under this section shall
constitute the jurisdictional predicate for application of
this title. This title shall apply to a distributed ledger
digital asset or a sealed token only where a sealed lex
situs exists under this section.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
43-1-303. Distributed ledger as an evidentiary
medium.

(a) A distributed ledger may record, evidence,
document or provide descriptive attributes for any
information, data, state, condition, process or transition,
whether or not such information carries legal force and
effect.

(b) Any information recorded on a distributed ledger
may include evidentiary information and descriptive
information, which shall be distinct categories under this
title.

(c) Any recording on a distributed ledger shall not,
by itself:

(i) Establish legal force and effect;

(ii) Create a property interest, contract,
obligation or jural relation; or

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(iii) Require legal classification solely by
virtue of the recording.

(d) Any legal force and effect may arise through
subsequent analysis determining that recorded information
meets applicable standards under a regime of law.

(e) This title shall distinguish between:

(i) The recording function of a distributed
ledger as an evidentiary medium;

(ii) The evidentiary standards applicable to the
recorded information; and

(iii) The legal characterization and effects, if
any, arising from subsequent analysis of the recorded
information.

(f) No court, agency or administrator shall presume
that information recorded on a distributed ledger
constitutes a security, commodity, financial instrument or
other regulated category solely by virtue of the recording
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
or solely by virtue of meeting the evidentiary standards.
The legal characterization of a distributed ledger shall
require analysis of functionality, legal effects and
subject matter under this title.

43-1-304. Categories of recorded information.

(a) Any information recorded on a distributed ledger
may include:

(i) Evidentiary information meeting standards
under this title, which may subsequently support the legal
force and effect upon application of an applicable regime
of law;

(ii) Descriptive information providing
attributes, metadata, state documentation or processual
data;

(iii) Information having immediate legal force
and effect under this title or any other applicable law;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(iv) Information having potential future legal
effect, including records that may become relevant to legal
proceedings, transactions or determinations.

(b) Any evidentiary information or descriptive
information recorded on a distributed ledger without
immediate legal force and effect may subsequently acquire
legal significance through:

(i) Subsequent determinations that any recorded
information meets evidentiary standards sufficient for
application of a regime of law;

(ii) Later associations with a sealed token or a
sealed jural relation;

(iii) Use as evidence in legal proceedings;

(iv) Incorporations into a transaction or a
legal determination;

(v) Any other circumstances establishing legal
relevance.
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(c) The sealed scope hierarchy under W.S. 43-1-204
through 43-1-209 shall provide the framework for
determining whether and when information recorded on a
distributed ledger constitutes a legal object, carries
legal effect or requires subject matter classification
under this title.

43-1-305. Sealed instrument classification.

(a) Classification of a token as an instrument under
this title shall relate to the transfer mechanism of the
token.

(b) Instrument classification shall apply regardless
of whether the token carries immediate legal force and
effect.

(c) Each token shall have a transfer mechanism
classification under the instrument framework of this title
to provide the foundation for subsequent legal analysis,
including potential treatment under the UCC.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
43-1-306. Non-repudiation and data integrity.

(a) A distributed ledger shall constitute a permanent
record of transactions, tokens and references to
transactions and tokens. References to transactions and
tokens shall include pointers to data, whether on-ledger or
off-ledger.

(b) The provisions of this title shall govern:

(i) Issues arising when data referenced by a
pointer constitutes mutable or repudiable data;

(ii) Non-repudiable data and verification
standards;

(iii) The relationship between mutable data and
evidentiary information and descriptive information under
this title.

(c) The issues addressed under subsection (b) of this
section shall constitute foundational issues and shall
apply to all legal analysis under this title.
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

43-1-307. Distributed legal effects; multi-aspect
analysis.

(a) Distributed ledger and token implementations
shall not produce legal objects in discrete forms with
distinct legal effects. Legal effects, rights and
obligations arising from distributed ledger systems shall
be fragmented across network nodes, protocol layers and
sequential transactions. Traditional legal methodologies
premised on unitary instruments or single-regime
classification shall be insufficient to address the
technical realities of distributed ledger architectures.

(b) Classifications and characterizations of a
distributed ledger digital asset or a sealed token shall
require multi-aspect analysis as provided under this title.

(c) The following designations under this title shall
provide the framework for rendering distributed legal
effects coherent under Wyoming law:

(i) Distributed ledger digital assets;
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(ii) Sealed tokens;

(iii) Sealed instruments;

(iv) Sealed interests;

(v) Sealed jural relations.

43-1-308. Application of distributed ledger digital
asset scope.

(a) The distributed ledger digital asset scope shall
apply where the operational realities of distributed ledger
systems and token implementation require aggregate analysis
across multiple tokens to provide comprehensive
interpretation of what constitutes a digital asset.

(b) Traditional legal analysis treating a token as a
single discrete unit shall not provide a sufficient basis
for interpretation where a distributed ledger digital asset
arises from multiple distributed ledger transactions
occurring:
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(i) Sequentially;

(ii) Concurrently; or

(iii) Across multiple parties.

CHAPTER 2
SEALED TOKEN LEX SITUS NEXUS PRIVACY PROVISIONS

ARTICLE 1
FOUNDATIONAL ANCHORS AND NEXUS PROPERTY CLASSIFICATIONS

43-2-101. Scope.

(a) This chapter shall provide the threshold
framework for determining the jurisdictional location of
digital assets and the protection of keyholder privacy
under this title.

(b) The provisions of this chapter shall govern the
establishment of Wyoming lex situs for all distributed
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
ledger digital assets and sealed tokens possessing a sealed
jurisdictional nexus to this state.

(c) This chapter shall apply to the forensic
discovery of jurisdictional vectors and the
characterization of computational corpus as intangible
property located in Wyoming.

43-2-102. Construction and interpretation.

(a) The provisions of this chapter shall be construed
to promote technical clarity and legal certainty for
participants exercising control over distributed ledger
records through cryptographic procedures.

(b) The interpretation of jurisdictional nexus shall
prioritize the establishment of a legal environment that
recognizes the distinct characteristics of distributed
ledger technology.

(c) Courts and agencies shall apply the multi-aspect
hierarchy provided under chapter 1 of this title when
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
evaluating computational indicia to identify lex situs
anchors.

43-2-103. Sealed keyholder lex situs; establishment
and designation.

(a) A sealed keyholder shall establish a sealed
keyholder lex situs in Wyoming upon establishment of a
sealed jurisdictional nexus under W.S. 43-2-105 and
attainment of a sealed keyholder status under this chapter.

(b) A sealed keyholder lex situs shall anchor the
sealed keyholder lex situs corpus to Wyoming for all
purposes under Wyoming law, including jurisdiction, choice
of law, perfection, priority and attachment of security
interests.

43-2-104. Sealed keyholder lex situs corpus;
intangible property designation.

(a) The sealed keyholder lex situs corpus shall be
designated as intangible property located in Wyoming.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(b) The designation under subsection (a) of this
section shall attach automatically upon attainment of a
sealed keyholder status under this chapter and shall
require no additional filing, registration or action by the
sealed keyholder.

(c) The sealed keyholder lex situs corpus designated
as intangible property under subsection (a) of this section
shall include:

(i) The cryptographic relationship between the
private key and its corresponding public key;

(ii) The juridical position of control over one
(1) or more public addresses and associated distributed
ledger records;

(iii) The capacity to generate valid
cryptographic signatures recognized by the applicable
protocol;

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(iv) All jural relations attaching to the sealed
keyholder's control over distributed ledger digital assets
or sealed tokens; and

(v) All rights, powers, privileges and
immunities arising from the sealed keyholder's status under
this title.

(d) For purposes of establishing the jurisdictional
anchor of the sealed keyholder lex situs corpus as a
distinct object of legal right, the sealed keyholder lex
situs corpus shall be deemed to be located in Wyoming.

43-2-105. Sealed keyholder lex situs; sealed
jurisdictional nexus; sealed keyholders.

(a) The laws of this state shall govern the sealed
keyholder lex situs corpus of any distributed ledger
digital asset or sealed token having a sealed
jurisdictional nexus to Wyoming as provided in this
section.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(b) A sealed jurisdictional nexus to this state shall
exist only when not less than one (1) keyholder of a
distributed ledger digital asset or a sealed token
satisfies one (1) or more of the following conditions:

(i) The keyholder, if a natural person,
maintains a domicile within this state;

(ii) The keyholder, if a legal entity, has been
organized, formed or registered to do business under the
laws of this state;

(iii) The keyholder serves as a custodian or is
licensed, chartered or authorized to conduct business under
the laws of this state; or

(iv) The keyholder operates as a qualified
custodian maintaining its principal place of business
within this state.

(c) A keyholder satisfying any condition enumerated
in subsection (b) of this section shall be designated as a
sealed keyholder with respect to the distributed ledger
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
digital asset or sealed token for which the keyholder has
demonstrated a sealed jurisdictional nexus.

(d) A contractual designation of Wyoming law as the
governing law of a digital asset or token transaction shall
not establish a sealed jurisdictional nexus to this state
absent not less than one (1) sealed keyholder as provided
in subsection (c) of this section.

(e) When no keyholder qualifies as a sealed keyholder
under subsection (c) of this section, no sealed
jurisdictional nexus to this state shall exist and this
title shall not govern the distributed ledger digital asset
or sealed token.

43-2-106. Subject matter lex situs; independent
determination.

(a) A subject matter lex situs shall be determined
independently of a sealed keyholder lex situs and shall
depend upon the nature, classification, location or
governing law of the subject matter itself.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(b) A subject matter lex situs shall be established
through examination of subject matter lex situs indicia.

(c) Upon determination of a subject matter lex situs,
the law of the determined jurisdiction shall govern the
subject matter lex situs corpus, independent of the law
governing the sealed keyholder lex situs corpus.

43-2-107. Analytical independence of lex situs
anchors.

(a) A sealed keyholder lex situs corpus and a subject
matter lex situs corpus shall constitute distinct
analytical objects requiring independent legal treatment at
separate stages of the analysis.

(b) A sealed token or a distributed ledger digital
asset may simultaneously have:

(i) A sealed keyholder lex situs in Wyoming; and

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(ii) A subject matter lex situs in Wyoming,
another jurisdiction or multiple jurisdictions depending on
the components of the subject matter.

(c) In analyzing a distributed ledger digital asset
or a sealed token under this title:

(i) A sealed keyholder lex situs shall be
evaluated first at the transaction level through
examination of sealed keyholder lex situs indicia;

(ii) A subject matter lex situs shall be
evaluated subsequently through examination of subject
matter lex situs indicia; and

(iii) The legal consequences applicable to each
corpus shall be determined under the law of each respective
situs and any applicable lex specialis.

43-2-108. Simultaneous lex specialis.

(a) A simultaneous lex specialis may occur when
different legal regimes apply distinct bodies of law to the
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
same subject matter or a sealed keyholder lex situs corpus
is based on the specific jural relations analyzed.

(b) The application of Wyoming law as lex specialis
to the sealed keyholder lex situs corpus shall not preclude
the simultaneous application of other lex specialis to the
subject matter lex situs corpus.

(c) Where simultaneous lex specialis applies, a court
shall harmonize the applicable legal regimes to the maximum
extent permitted by law, giving legal force and effect to
the specific purposes and protections of each regime.

(d) The designation of a sealed keyholder lex situs
corpus as intangible property under this title shall
constitute a specific application of lex specialis for
jurisdictional and property location purposes under Wyoming
law.

43-2-109. Discovery of lex situs; forensic analysis.

(a) The establishment of a sealed keyholder lex situs
or a subject matter lex situs shall result from a discovery
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
process involving forensic and legal analysis of the
computational corpus to identify verifiable jurisdictional
vectors.

(b) The discovery process shall utilize the
multi-aspect hierarchy to examine computational indicia for
the purpose of synthesizing the legal conclusion of a
sealed token or identifying a subject matter situs.

(c) A party to the action or a court conducting a
discovery process may rely upon cryptographic signatures,
metadata, content identifiers, zero-knowledge proofs or
third-party attestations maintained within the
computational corpus.

(d) The discovery process may extend to an associated
sealed token to the extent necessary to determine the legal
consequences of the associated sealed token's interaction
with a sealed token's sealed keyholder lex situs corpus.

43-2-110. Evidentiary standards and presumptions.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(a) Computational indicia generated through
cryptographic embodiment or forensic discovery shall
constitute prima facie evidence of the corresponding lex
situs corpus, subject to rebuttal through evidence of fraud
or technical malfunction.

(b) The discovery of a sealed keyholder having a
Wyoming nexus shall create a rebuttable presumption of a
Wyoming lex situs for the sealed keyholder lex situs
corpus.

(c) Nonrepudiable data recorded within the
computational corpus shall satisfy the requirements for
attribution and authentication under title 40, chapter 30
of the Wyoming statutes and the Uniform Electronic
Transactions Act.

43-2-111. Associated sealed tokens; applicability and
scope.

(a) An associated sealed token connection shall exist
only where the legal consequences of an associated token
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
affect the sealed token's sealed keyholder lex situs
corpus, subject matter lex situs corpus or jural relations.

(b) Association through metadata, off-chain
references or non-transactional mechanisms shall not
establish the status of an associated sealed token under
this title.

(c) Any associated sealed token engaging in a
distributed ledger transaction with a sealed token may be
subject to a legal analysis under this title to determine
the legal consequences of that transaction.

(d) An associated sealed token shall not become a
sealed token by virtue of the associated sealed token's
association and shall remain subject to the law of the
associated sealed token's own lex situs unless the
associated sealed token independently satisfies the
designation factors.

ARTICLE 2
KEYHOLDER SITUS

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
43-2-201. Establishment of keyholder situs.

(a) A keyholder shall establish keyholder situs by
executing a cryptographic signature using a private key
over a distributed ledger transaction or other data.

(b) A distributed ledger transaction shall contain a
signifier in the form of a public address or wallet address
corresponding to the public key derived from the signing
private key.

(c) A keyholder may demonstrate continued control
over a public address by re-signing a challenge using the
same private key, which shall constitute non-repudiable
proof of control.

43-2-202. Characterization of keyholder situs corpus
and indicia.

(a) The corpus of a keyholder situs shall include the
mathematical relationship between a private key and its
corresponding public key and the juridical position of
control over associated records.
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(b) The indicia of keyholder situs shall include a
valid cryptographic signature, a public address derived
from the corresponding public key and protocol-specific
validation confirming mathematical integrity.

(c) A keyholder situs indicia satisfying subsection
(b) of this section shall constitute prima facie evidence
of a keyholder situs and an intent to sign at the time the
signature was executed.

43-2-203. Signing and finalization; juridical stages.

(a) The act of cryptographically signing a
distributed ledger transaction and the act of finalizing
the distributed ledger transaction shall constitute
distinct juridical events with separate legal consequences.

(b) A cryptographic signature applied to a
transaction that has not been finalized shall establish a
keyholder situs but shall not create, transfer or
extinguish any jural relation.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(c) A distributed ledger transaction shall achieve
legal validity and operative effect only upon finalization
as determined by the applicable protocol's consensus
mechanism or validation rules.

(d) Where a transaction has been signed but not
finalized and subsequently finalized without alteration,
the keyholder situs established at signing shall be
presumed to continue through finalization.

CHAPTER 3
SEALED JURAL RELATIONS PROVISIONS

ARTICLE 1
GENERAL PROVISIONS

43-3-101. Scope.

(a) This chapter shall apply to all governance jural
relations, governance tokens and governance mechanisms
recorded on or referenced by a distributed ledger.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(b) The provisions of this chapter shall govern the
legal characterization of collective decision-making
processes associated with distributed ledger digital assets
and sealed tokens.

43-3-102. Construction and interpretation.

(a) Courts, agencies and other interpreters shall
construe the provisions of this chapter to promote legal
certainty for participants in decentralized governance
systems.

(b) Interpretation of governance jural relations
shall proceed through the application of multi-aspect
analysis and the hierarchy of scope established under
article 1, chapter 1 of this title.

(c) The determination of any governance jural
relation shall require an analysis of a governance indicia
to establish the existence of the corresponding governance
corpus.

ARTICLE 2
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
GOVERNANCE PROVISIONS

43-3-201. Governance token; classification; legal
effect.

(a) A governance token shall constitute a sealed
token or distributed ledger digital asset that represents
one (1) or more governance jural relations, including
governance powers, governance liabilities, governance
immunities or governance disabilities, with respect to a
distributed ledger digital asset, sealed token, protocol,
smart contract or organization.

(b) The governance token corpus of a governance token
shall comprise the bundle of governance jural relations
represented by the token, including governance powers,
governance liabilities, governance immunities and
governance disabilities associated with holding, delegating
or disposing of the governance token.

(c) The governance token indicia of a governance
token shall include token balances, token classes, on-chain
role mappings, delegation records, vesting status and
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
protocol logic linking tokens to governance mechanisms,
from which a governance token corpus may be determined
through characterization under this title.

(d) A governance token may evidence one (1) or more
of the following governance jural relations:

(i) Governance power, including voting power,
proposal power, delegation power and veto power;

(ii) Governance liability, including the
correlative liability of a person, organization or protocol
to have the governance token's governance jural relations
changed by the exercise of a governance power;

(iii) Governance immunity, including minority
protections, veto rights, supermajority requirements and
charter-based constraints; and

(iv) Governance disability, including the
correlative absence of governance power by which a person
or class of persons cannot change the governance jural
relations of an immunity holder.
HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488

(e) The holder of a governance token may exercise
governance power through:

(i) A vote, by distributed ledger transaction,
smart contract interaction or protocol mechanism;

(ii) A proposal, submitted for consideration
under a governance mechanism;

(iii) A delegation by transferring the exercise
of a governance power to a delegate without transferring
the underlying governance token or governance jural
relation; or

(iv) Any other governance mechanism specified in
the governing instrument or protocol.

(f) A governance action shall have legal force and
effect only upon satisfaction of a quorum as defined by the
applicable governing instrument, protocol or smart
contract.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
(g) The governing instrument applicable to a
governance token shall define the governance jural
relations, governance mechanisms and decision-making
procedures applicable to the governance token and may take
the form of articles of organization, an operating
agreement, bylaws, governing principles, protocol rules,
smart contract code or any other instrument.

(h) The indicia-corpus characterization and subject
matter characterization of a governance token shall proceed
under the analytical framework established in this title,
and the sealed instrument classification of the governance
token shall determine the governance token's transfer
mechanics and legal effects.

(j) Nothing in this section shall alter or diminish
the application of federal securities law, the UCC or any
other law applicable to a governance token that constitutes
a security, investment property or controllable electronic
record under that law.

HB0160

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0488
Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0160